Massachusetts, session 194th, H5138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 10A of chapter 255D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by added at the end thereof of the following 2 
paragraphs:- 
In any case in which the total transaction amount, including any taxes or fees, ends with 1 
cent, 2 cents, 6 cents, or 7 cents as the final digit, the amount of cents in the sum shall be 
rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by 5 for any buyer seeking to make a payment or 
portion thereof with legal tender.  In any case in which the total transaction amount, including 
any taxes or fees, ends with 3 cents, 4 cents, 8 cents, or 9 cents as the final digit, the amount of 
cents in the sum shall be rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by 5 for any buyer seeking 
to make a payment or portion thereof with legal tender; provided, however, where the total 
transaction amount, including any taxes or fees, totals $0.01 or $0.02, such transaction may be 
rounded up to $0.05 for any buyer seeking to make a payment with legal tender.  

of 2 13  The foregoing paragraph shall not apply to goods or services where a buyer offers to use 
as total payment: electronic fund transfer, check, gift card, money order, credit card, or other 
similar instrument or method not legal tender.  
SECTION 2.  The office of consumer affairs and business regulation shall promulgate 
rules and regulations necessary to ensure that establishments provide adequate notice to buyers 
and maintain the necessary systems and protocols in place relative to the use of legal tender or 
other forms of payment for goods and services.